Maryland, session 2026, SB0116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
10–101.
In this title, “Board” means the Board of Public Works.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0116*

SENATE BILL 116
10–208.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO THE FOLLOWING CATEGORIES OF
CONTRACTS SUBMITTED TO THE BOARD FOR ITS APPROVAL:
(1) ARCHITECTURAL AND ENGINEERING SERVICES;
(2) CONSTRUCTION;
(3) ENERGY PERFORMANCE;
(4) GENERAL MISCELLANEOUS;
(5) LANDLORD LEASE; AND
(6) TENANT LEASE.
(B) THE BOARD SHALL REQUIRE AN AGENCY TO PROVIDE, TO THE EXTENT
APPLICABLE, THE FOLLOWING CLIMATE AND SUSTAINABILITY INFORMATION ON
SUBMISSION OF A CONTRACT AWARD RECOMMENDATION TO THE BOARD:
(1) IF THE CONTRACT CONTRIBUTES TO THE STATE’S GREENHOUSE
GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTION OR NET–ZERO CARBON GOALS, HOW THOSE BENEFITS
ARE ATTAINED;
(2) HOW THE CONTRACT PROVIDES FOR RESILIENCE ADAPTATION TO
PROJECTED CLIMATE CHANGE AND EXTREME WEATHER EVENTS OVER THE TERM OR
THE USEFUL LIFE OF THE SUPPLIES OR SERVICES;
(3) HOW THE CONTRACT ADVANCES THE STATE’S GOALS AND
LEADERSHIP ON CLIMATE MITIGATION, ADAPTATION, RESILIENCY, OR INNOVATION
FOR SUSTAINABLY SOURCED SUPPLIES OR SERVICES;
(4) HOW THE CONTRACT INCLUDES SUPPLIES OR SERVICES THAT ARE
ENVIRONMENTALLY PREFERABLE, AS DEFINED BY THE MARYLAND GREEN
PURCHASING COMMITTEE UNDER § 14–410 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(5) HOW THE CONTRACT INCORPORATES ASPECTS OF DESIGN OR
CONSTRUCTION THAT ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE STANDARDS ADOPTED BY THE
MARYLAND GREEN BUILDING COUNCIL; AND

SENATE BILL 116 3
(6) HOW THE CONTRACT INCORPORATES ASPECTS OF DESIGN OR
CONSTRUCTION THAT ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE INTENT OF THE HIGH
PERFORMANCE BUILDING REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 3–602.1 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(C) THE LIAISONS TO THE BOARD FROM THE OFFICES OF THE GOVERNOR,
THE COMPTROLLER, AND THE STATE TREASURER SHALL:
(1) ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(2) ENSURE THAT THE INFORMATION REQUIRED IN THIS SECTION
APPEARS ON THE AGENDA OF THE BOARD WHEN THE CONTRACT IS TO BE
CONSIDERED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.